Massachusetts, session 194th, H1394.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 12 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting, after paragraph 4, the following paragraph:- 
Notwithstanding the provisions of any general or special law to the contrary, any program 
of home and community based services funded pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, in 
which family members are permitted to serve as caregivers paid by MassHealth, shall include 
legally liable family members, including but not limited to biological, adoptive, foster or step 
parents, legal guardians, powers of attorney, healthcare powers of attorney, and adult children of 
care recipient, within the definition of family member; provided further, the executive office of 
health and human services shall file a state plan amendment or waiver application, as may be 
required, to allow legally liable family members to serve as caregivers paid by MassHealth.